de: Verstellbarkeit der Fußstütze: Verstellbar; Feststehend; Keine; Abnehmbar; Sonstiges
da: Justerbarhed for fodstøtte: Justerbar; Fast; Ingen; Aftagelig; Andet
ja: フットレスト調節機能: 調整可能; 固定式; なし; 取り外し可能; その他
tr: Ayak desteği ayarlanabilirliği: Ayarlanabilir; Sabit; Yok; Çıkarılabilir; Diğer
zh-TW: 腳凳可調解性: 可調整; 固定式; 無; 可拆卸; 其他
cs: Nastavitelnost opěrky nohou: Nastavitelná; Pevná; Žádná; Odnímatelná; Jiná
lt-LT: Pakojo reguliavimas: Reguliuojamas; Fiksuotas; Nėra; Nuimamas; Kita
hr-HR: Podesivost oslonca za noge: Prilagodljivo; Fiksno; Nema; Odvojivo; Ostalo
sl-SI: Nastavljivost naslona za noge: Nastavljivo; Fiksno; Brez; Odstranljivo; Drugo
fi: Jalkatuen säädettävyys: Säädettävä; Kiinteä; Ei mitään; Irrotettava; Muu
zh-CN: 脚踏可调性: 可调节; 固定; 无; 可拆卸; 其他
es: Capacidad de ajuste del reposapíes: Ajustable; Fijo; Ninguno; Removible; Otro
pt-BR: Ajuste do apoio para os pés: Ajustável; Fixo; Nenhum; Removível; Outro
pl: Możliwość regulacji podnóżka: Regulowany; Stały; Brak; Odłączany; Inny
en: Footrest adjustability: Adjustable; Fixed; None; Removable; Other
pt-PT: Adaptabilidade do apoio para os pés: Ajustável; Fixo; Nenhum; Amovível; Outro
sk-SK: Nastaviteľnosť opierky na nohu: Nastaviteľná; Pevná; Žiadna; Odnímateľná; Iné
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh của chỗ để chân: Có thể điều chỉnh; Cố định; Không có; Có thể tháo rời; Khác
it: Regolabilità del poggiapiedi: Regolabile; Fisso; Nessuno; Rimovibile; Altro
fr: Réglage du repose-pieds: Réglable; Fixe; Aucun; Amovible; Autre
bg-BG: Регулируемост на поставката за крака: Регулируема; Фиксирана; Няма; Подвижна; Друга
ru: Регулируемость подножки: Регулируемый; Фиксированный; Отсутствует; Съемный; Другое
nb: Justerbarhet for fotstøtte: Justerbar; Fast; Ingen; Avtakbar; Annet
el: Δυνατότητα προσαρμογής υποπόδιου: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Σταθερό; Κανένα; Αφαιρούμενο; Άλλο
ko: 발 받침대 조절 기능: 조절 가능; 고정식; 없음; 탈착식; 기타
hu: Lábtámasz állíthatósága: Állítható; Fix; Nincs; Eltávolítható; Egyéb
th: ความสามารถในการปรับที่วางเท้า: ปรับได้; ตายตัว; ไม่มี; ถอดได้; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Posibilitatea de reglare a suportului pentru picioare: Ajustabil; Fix; Fără; Detașabil; Altele
sv: Justering av fotstöd: Justerbar; Fast; Ingen; Avtagbar; Övrigt
nl: Verstelbaarheid voetsteun: Verstelbaar; Vast; Geen; Afneembaar; Overige